Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-26] Chapter does not apply to active
duty armed forces, National Guard, armed forces reserve, or Police Activities
League. This chapter shall not apply to any mixed martial arts contest
held as a recreational activity by active duty armed forces, armed forces
reserve, or National Guard personnel, or the Police Activities League, when the
contest is held under the supervision of a recreational officer of the active
duty armed forces, armed forces reserve, National Guard, or a Police Activities
League staff member. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next